North Dakota statutes. TITLE 52 Social Security
CHAPTER 52-04 Contributions

52-04-00.1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Agency” or “bureau” means job service North Dakota.

“Client company” means a person that contracts to receive services, within the course of that person’s usual business, from a staffing service or that contracts to lease any or all of that person’s employees from a staffing service.

“Knowingly” means having actual knowledge of or acting with deliberate ignorance or reckless disregard for the prohibition involved.

“Staffing service” means an employer in the business of providing the employer’s employees to a client company to perform services within the course of that client company’s usual business. The term includes a professional employer organization, a staff leasing company, an employee leasing organization, and a temporary staffing company. The term “staffing service” must be broadly construed to encompass an entity that offers services provided by a professional employer organization, a staff leasing company, an employee leasing organization, or a temporary staffing company, regardless of the term used.

“Temporary staffing” or “temporary staffing service” means an arrangement through which an employer hires its own employees and assigns the employees to a client company to support or supplement the client company’s workforce in a special work situation, including an employee’s temporary absence; a temporary skill shortage; a seasonal workload; or a special assignment or project with a targeted end date.

“Unemployment insurance tax rate” means the rate calculated or assigned under sections 52-04-05 and 52-04-06.

“Violates or attempts to violate” includes intent to evade, misrepresentation, and willful nondisclosure.

“Workforce” means some or all of the employees of a transferring employer.

The term does not include an arrangement through which the majority of the client company’s workforce has been assigned by a temporary staffing service for a period of more than twelve consecutive months.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 456, § 1.

52-04-01.
Payment of contributions by employer.

Contributions accrue and become payable by each employer, for each calendar year in which the employer is subject to the North Dakota unemployment compensation law, with respect to wages for employment. Such contributions become due and must be paid by each employer to the bureau for the fund in accordance with such regulations as the bureau may prescribe, and may not be deducted in whole or in part, from the wages of individuals in such employer’s employ. In the payment of any contributions, a fractional part of a cent must be disregarded unless it amounts to one-half cent or more, in which case it must be increased to one cent.

Contributions due with respect to wages for insured work must be deemed to have been paid to the fund as of the date payment was made as contributions therefor under another state or federal employment security law, if payment into the fund of such contributions is made on such terms as the bureau finds will be fair and reasonable as to all affected interests.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 4, subs. a, subds. 1, 2; 1941, ch. 261, § 2, subs. a, subds. 1, 2; R.C. 1943, § 52-0401; S.L. 1945, ch. 284, § 5; 1951, ch. 294, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 52-0401.

52-04-01.1.
Electronic filing of contribution and wage reports — Electronic payment of contributions — Assessments.

Each employer required to file contribution and wage reports shall file the reports by an electronic method approved by the bureau beginning with the calendar quarter in which the employer is first required to file a report. An employer that does not comply with the requirements to file reports electronically is deemed to have failed to submit any employer’s contribution and wage report as provided in section 52-04-11. All contribution payments must be paid electronically.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 440, § 1; 2009, ch. 442, § 1; 2017, ch. 164, § 1, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2017.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 442, S.L. 2009 is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2009.

This section becomes effective January 1, 2008.

52-04-02.
Rates and base of contributions of wages payable by employer.

Each employer shall pay contributions equal to the following percentages of wages payable by the employer with respect to employment:

One and eight-tenths percent with respect to employment occurring during the calendar year 1937.

Two and seven-tenths percent with respect to employment occurring during the calendar years 1938, 1939, and 1940.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 4, subs. b, subds. 1, 2; 1941, ch. 261, § 2, subs. b, subds. 1 (a), (b); R.C. 1943, § 52-0402; S.L. 1945, ch. 284, § 5; 1957 Supp., § 52-0402.

52-04-03.
Rates and base of contributions of wages paid by employer.

Subject to the exceptions and modifications provided for in this section and elsewhere in this chapter, each employer shall pay contributions to the fund equal to two and seven-tenths percent of wages paid by the employer to any one individual employee during a calendar year with respect to employment, which also includes service constituting employment under the employment security law of any other state as defined in the North Dakota unemployment compensation law or of the federal government. “Employment”, as so inclusive, is applicable throughout to this chapter.

The amount of an individual’s wages paid to that individual in a calendar year by each employer and subject to tax may not be in excess of three thousand dollars for the years prior to 1968, nor in excess of three thousand three hundred dollars for 1968, nor in excess of three thousand four hundred dollars for 1969, nor in excess of three thousand eight hundred dollars for 1970, nor in excess of four thousand dollars for 1971, nor in excess of four thousand four hundred dollars for 1972, nor in excess of four thousand two hundred dollars for 1973, 1974, 1975, and 1976, nor in excess of four thousand three hundred dollars for 1977, and not in excess of six thousand dollars in 1978.

For the year 1979 and each year thereafter, the amount of an individual’s wages subject to tax, paid by each employer, must be in such amount as determined to be in an amount that is equal to seventy percent of a statewide average annual wage, rounded to the nearest one hundred dollars, determined by the bureau on or before each first day of October by the following computation:

Notwithstanding any of the provisions of subsection 3, the amount of an individual’s wages subject to tax must always be at least equal to the amount that is subject to tax under the Federal Unemployment Tax Act [68A Stat. 439; 26 U.S.C. 3301 et seq.].

The total wages
reported on contribution reports for the third and fourth quarters
of the preceding calendar year and the first and second quarters of
the current calendar year must be divided by the average monthly number
of covered workers for the same four quarters, whose number must be
determined by dividing by twelve the total covered employment reported
on contribution reports for those quarters, and the quotient obtained
by dividing the total wages by the average monthly number of covered
workers is the statewide average annual wage.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 4, subs. b, subds. 2, 3; 1941, ch. 261, § 2, subs. b, subds. 1(a), (b), 2, 3; R.C. 1943, § 52-0403; S.L. 1945, ch. 284, § 5; 1951, ch. 294, § 2; 1953, ch. 295, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 52-0403; S.L. 1967, ch. 372, § 1; 1973, ch. 392, § 1; 1979, ch. 523, § 1; 1983, ch. 537, § 1.

52-04-04.
Separate account of employer’s contributions kept.

The bureau shall maintain a separate account for each employer showing the employer’s contributions and shall credit the employer’s account with all the contributions paid by the employer since January 1, 1937. The provisions of the North Dakota unemployment compensation law may not be construed to grant any employer or individuals in the employer’s service prior claims or rights to the amounts paid by the employer into the fund.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 4, subs. c, subd. 1; 1941, ch. 261, § 2, subs. c, subd. 1; R.C. 1943, § 52-0404; S.L. 1945, ch. 284, § 5; 1957 Supp., § 52-0404.

52-04-05.
Determination of rates.

As used in this section:

“Income needed to pay benefits” means the estimate of benefits payable in a given calendar year less the estimate of interest to be earned by the unemployment insurance trust fund for that calendar year.

“Solvency balance” means the income needed, whether a positive or negative figure, in a given rate year to reach the solvency target over the number of years remaining of the period within which the solvency target is to be reached plus the estimate of the amount of income needed to pay benefits.

“Trust fund reserve” excludes all Reed Act [42 U.S.C. 1103] cash.

For each calendar year, the bureau separately shall estimate the amount of income needed to pay benefits and shall estimate the amount of income needed to reach a solvency balance in the unemployment insurance trust fund, that moves toward the solvency target amount as determined under this subsection. The solvency target is an average high-cost multiple of one. The average high-cost multiple is the number of years the bureau could pay unemployment compensation, based on the reserve ratio, if the bureau paid the compensation at a rate equivalent to the average benefit cost rate in the one calendar year during the preceding twenty calendar years and the two calendar years during the preceding ten calendar years in which the benefit cost rates were the highest. “Reserve ratio” means the ratio determined by dividing the balance in the trust fund reserve at the end of the calendar year by the total covered wages in the state for that year. “Benefit cost rate” means the rate determined by dividing the unemployment compensation benefits paid during a calendar year by the total covered wages in the state for that year. The computation of the reserve ratio and benefit cost rate must exclude the wages and unemployment compensation paid by employers covered under section 3309 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended [26 U.S.C. 3309].

The initial trust fund solvency target must be achieved over a seven-year period from January 1, 2000. After the solvency target required by this section is reached, the calculation of the solvency target must be continued and, if the trust fund reserve as of December thirty-first of any year is less or greater than the solvency target, the rates must be adjusted so that one-fifth of the difference between the solvency target and the current trust fund reserve is estimated to be collected in the following rate year.

Progress toward achieving the solvency target is measured by reducing any difference between one and the average high-cost multiple of the state by an amount that is at least equal to the ratio of the number of years left to reach the solvency target to the difference between the trust fund reserve and the targeted amount. In setting tax rates, the amount of the trust fund reserve may not be allowed to fall below three hundred percent from a standard margin of error for the targeted amount of the trust fund reserve. The executive director may make reasonable adjustments to the tax rates set for a calendar year to prevent significant rate variations between calendar years.

Rates must be determined as follows:

The income needed to pay benefits for the calendar year must be divided by the estimated taxable wages for the calendar year. The result rounded to the next higher one-hundredth of one percent is the average required rate needed to pay benefits.

The positive employer minimum rate in the first rate schedule of the table of rate schedules is one-hundredth of one percent. The positive employer minimum rate in each subsequent rate schedule of the table of rate schedules is the previous rate schedule’s positive employer minimum rate plus one-hundredth of one percent. The negative employer minimum rate needed to generate the amount of income needed to pay benefits is the positive employer minimum rate as described in this subsection plus six percent.

The positive employer minimum rate necessary to generate the amount of income needed to pay benefits must be set so that all the rates combined generate the average required rate for income needed to pay benefits, multiplied by the ratio, calculated under subdivision d, needed to reach the solvency balance. The negative employer maximum rate necessary to generate the amount of income needed to pay benefits is the negative employer minimum rate necessary to generate the amount of income needed to pay benefits plus three and six-tenths percent. However, the maximum rate must be at least five and four-tenths percent.

The tax rate necessary to generate the amount of income needed to reach a solvency balance must be calculated by dividing the solvency balance by the amount of income estimated as needed to pay benefits and multiplying the resulting ratio times each rate, within the positive and negative rate arrays, with a minimum multiplier of one hundred percent for the negative rate array, as determined under this section to meet the average required rate needed to pay benefits as defined by subdivision a. The ratio calculated under this subdivision must also be multiplied by any rate calculated as required by subsection 6 to arrive at a final rate for a new business. All results calculated under this subdivision must be rounded to the nearest one-hundredth of one percent.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an employer’s rate may not be less than the negative employer minimum rate for a calendar year unless the employer’s account has been chargeable with benefits throughout the thirty-six-consecutive-calendar-month period ending on September thirtieth of the preceding calendar year. If an employer in construction services has not been subject to the law as required, that employer qualifies for a reduced rate if the account has been chargeable with benefits throughout the twenty-four-consecutive-calendar-month period ending September thirtieth of the preceding calendar year. If an employer in nonconstruction services has not been subject to the law as required, the employer in nonconstruction services qualifies for a reduced rate if the account has been chargeable with benefits throughout the twelve-consecutive-calendar-month period ending September thirtieth of the preceding calendar year. The executive director may provide any negative employer whose contributions paid into the trust fund are greater than the benefit charges against that employer’s account, for a minimum of three consecutive years immediately preceding the computation date or subject to the law as required, with up to a thirty percent reduction to that employer’s rate for any year if that employer has in place a plan approved by the bureau which addresses substantive changes to that employer’s business operation and ensures that any rate reduction provided will not put the employer account back into a negative status.

An employer that does not qualify under subdivision a is subject to a rate determined as follows:

For each calendar year new employers must be assigned a rate that is ninety percent of the positive employer maximum rate or a rate of one percent, whichever is greater, unless the employer is classified in construction services. However, an employer must be assigned within the negative employer rate ranges for any year if, as of the computation date, the cumulative benefits charged to that employer’s account equal or exceed the cumulative contributions paid on or before October thirty-first with respect to wages paid by that employer before October first of that year. All results calculated under this paragraph must be rounded to the nearest one-hundredth of one percent.

New employers in construction services must be assigned the negative employer maximum rate.

Assignment by the bureau of an employer’s industrial classification for the purposes of this section must be the three-digit major group provided in the North American industrial classification system manual, in accordance with established classification practices found in the North American industrial classification system manual, issued by the executive office of the president, office of management and budget. Employers who are liable for coverage before August 1, 2001, remain under an industrial classification under the two-digit major group provided in the standard industrial classification manual unless they are classified in the construction industry within the standard industrial classification code.

An employer who has ceased to be liable for contributions shall continue its established experience rating account if it again becomes liable within three years from the date that it ceased to be liable providing that the employer’s experience record has not been transferred in accordance with section 52-04-08. The employer’s rate, however, must be determined in accordance with subsection 6.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 332, § 1; 1991, ch. 536, § 1; 1991, ch. 537, § 1; 1995, ch. 481, § 1; 1997, ch. 421, § 1; 1999, ch. 435, § 1; 2001, ch. 42, § 4; 2001, ch. 452, § 1; 2001, ch. 453, § 1; 2005, ch. 457, § 1; 2007, ch. 442, § 1; 2007, ch. 441, § 1; 2009, ch. 443, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 443, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 442, S.L. 2007 became effective July 1, 2007.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 441, S.L. 2007 became effective July 1, 2007.

52-04-06.
Variations in standard rate of contributions — How determined.

An employer’s reserve ratio is the difference between the six-year contributions paid by that employer on or before October thirty-first of any year, with respect to wages paid by that employer before October first of that same year, and the six-year benefits charged to that employer’s account before October first of that year, divided by the average annual payroll. Employers whose cumulative contributions exceed cumulative benefits must be assigned within the positive employer rate groups. Employers whose cumulative contributions are equal to or less than cumulative benefits must be assigned within the negative employer rate groups.

For each calendar year the bureau shall establish a schedule of positive employer rate groups within the positive employer minimum rate and the positive employer maximum rate determined under section 52-04-05. Each successive rate group for positive employer rate groups must be assigned a rate equal to one hundred twenty percent of the previous group’s rate with a minimum increase of one-tenth of one percent and a maximum increase of four-tenths of one percent. The number of rate groups in the positive employer schedule must be ten. For each calendar year the bureau shall establish a schedule of negative employer rate groups with the negative employer minimum rate and the negative employer maximum rate determined under section 52-04-05. Each successive rate group for negative employer rate groups must be assigned a rate equal to the previous group’s rate plus four-tenths of one percent. The number of rate groups in the negative employer schedule must be the number required to provide for a rate group at each four-tenths of one percent interval between the negative employer minimum rate and the negative employer maximum rate determined under section 52-04-05. All results calculated under this subsection must be rounded to the nearest one-hundredth of one percent.

Positive employers must be assigned to the rate in the positive employer rate schedule in the rank order of their reserve ratios, as determined in subsection 1, with the highest reserve ratio positive employers assigned to the first positive employer rate. Each successively ranked positive employer must be assigned to a rate within the positive employer rate schedule so that the first rate within the rate schedule is assigned sixty percent of the positive employer’s prior year’s taxable wages and each of the remaining nine rates within the rate schedule are assigned the same proportion of the remaining forty percent of the positive employer’s prior year’s taxable wages. Negative employers must be assigned to the rate in the negative employer rate schedule in the rank order of their reserve ratios, as determined in subsection 1, with the highest reserve ratio negative employers assigned to the first negative employer rate. Each successively ranked negative employer must be assigned to a rate within the negative employer rate schedule so that each rate within the rate schedule is assigned the same proportion of the negative employer’s prior year’s taxable wages.

After each year’s rate schedule has been established, an employer may pay into the fund, or cause to be paid into the fund on the employer’s behalf, an amount in excess of the contributions required to be paid under this section. That amount must be credited to the employer’s separate account. The employer’s rate must be recomputed with the amount paid pursuant to this subsection included only, except as allowed by subdivision b, if that amount was paid by April thirtieth of that year. Payments may not be refunded or used as credit in the payment of contributions.

An employer that enters a contract with a staffing service, other than a temporary staffing service, may make the payments authorized by this subsection at any time during the rate year and the agency will determine if that payment is adequate to allow the staffing service to comply with subsection 3 of section 52-04-24; however, the employer’s tax rate will remain in effect for the remainder of the tax year. The agency will deposit any payment received pursuant to this subsection immediately and will credit it to the employer’s separate account, but the agency will apply the payment to the calculation of the employer’s tax rate for the following rate year. In order to take advantage of this subdivision and subsection 3 of section 52-04-24, an employer may not be delinquent in its unemployment insurance tax payments on the date on which the payment authorized by this subdivision is made.

In the bureau’s determination of the projected income requirements for computing contribution rates and taxable wage base, only the wages paid by, and the cost of benefits attributable to, tax-rated employers may be taken into account.

If an employer has a quarterly taxable payroll in excess of fifty thousand dollars and at least three times its established average annual payroll or the average annual payroll is zero, and the employer’s cumulative lifetime reserve balance is positive, then the tax rate for that employer is ninety percent of the positive employer maximum rate in effect that year or a rate of one percent, whichever is greater, beginning the first day of the calendar quarter in which it occurred and for the remainder of the calendar year. If the employer’s cumulative lifetime reserve balance is negative, then the tax rate for that employer is the negative employer maximum rate of contribution in effect that year, beginning the first day of the calendar quarter in which it occurred and for the remainder of the calendar year.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 4, subs. c, subds. 3(ii), 3(iii); 1941, ch. 261, § 2, subs. c, subds. 7, 8(a); R.C. 1943, § 52-0406; S.L. 1945, ch. 284, § 5; 1949, ch. 304, § 1; 1953, ch. 296, § 1; 1955, ch. 304, § 3; 1957 Supp., § 52-0406; S.L. 1959, ch. 353, § 3; 1961, ch. 313, § 2; 1963, ch. 333, § 1; 1967, ch. 372, § 2; 1973, ch. 391, §§ 12, 27; 1975, ch. 457, §§ 2, 3, 6; 1977, ch. 464, § 1; 1977, ch. 465, § 1; 1979, ch. 523, § 3; 1979, ch. 524, § 1; 1981, ch. 501, § 4; 1983, ch. 538, § 1; 1985, ch. 543, § 3; 1987, ch. 595, § 2; 1995, ch. 481, § 2; 1999, ch. 435, § 2; 2001, ch. 454, § 1; 2005, ch. 456, § 3; 2007, ch. 441, § 2; 2009, ch. 443, § 2.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 443, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 441, S.L. 2007
became effective July 1, 2007.

52-04-06.1.
Construction project risk protection.

Any project in this state with an estimated construction cost of at least fifty million dollars which is planned to be completed or discontinued within a period of seven years is subject to this section. The general or prime contractor, or the owner in those situations in which there is no general or prime contractor, of a project that meets the criteria specified under this section shall post the bond or irrevocable letter of credit required in subsection 2 before commencement of construction work on the project and shall report annually, within thirty days of the anniversary date the project becomes subject to this section, to the bureau any change in the construction costs of projects subject to this section.

If the bureau determines that the project is or will be within the criteria stated by this section, the bureau shall require the general or prime contractor, or the owner in those situations in which there is no general or prime contractor, for whom the project is being constructed, on behalf of each employing unit, excluding design and engineering firms, to post a bond executed by a surety company authorized to do business in the state or an irrevocable letter of credit from a federal deposit insurance corporation insured state or nationally chartered bank authorized to do business in the state which will insure payment for all benefits claimed by employees of all employing units working on the project. The bureau may adjust the amount of bond or irrevocable letter of credit required under this subsection to cover any significant increases or decreases in project construction costs reported by the general or prime contractor or owner. If any general or prime contractor or owner fails to comply with this subsection, the bureau may apply to any court of this state within the jurisdiction in which the contractor or owner is found, located, or transacts business to obtain an order to compel the general or prime contractor or owner to post the required bond or irrevocable letter of credit required under this subsection. Any failure to obey an order of the court may be punished by the court as a contempt of court.

The amount of bond or irrevocable letter of credit must be the difference between the estimated benefits paid and estimated contributions, multiplied by fifty percent. The estimation of contributions expected must be made as follows: multiply the current year’s positive employer minimum rate times the current year’s taxable wage base times the estimated number of employees on the project using figures from project plans, times the number of years between the start date and the estimated completion date of the project. The estimation of benefits paid must be made as follows: multiply the estimated number of employees, from the project plans, times the current year’s maximum weekly benefit amount times the duration, twelve weeks for the first year and twelve weeks for subsequent years, times the number of years between the start date and the completion date rounded up to the next whole number.

Thirty months after the completion or discontinuance of the project, the bureau shall determine the total benefits paid to employees of the employing unit or units. If the total amount paid to the employees of the unit or units exceeds the total amount of contributions collected from the units under the North Dakota unemployment compensation law, the general or prime contractor, or the owner in those situations in which there is no general or prime contractor, shall pay the total amount of benefits paid to the employees of the units which exceeded the total amount of contributions collected from the unit or units. If the general or prime contractor, or the owner in those situations in which there is no general or prime contractor, does not pay the payment requirement, job service North Dakota shall collect the payment from the surety company that executed the surety bond or bank that issued the irrevocable letter of credit. The general or prime contractor, or the owner in those situations in which there is no general or prime contractor, shall remain liable for any amount of benefits paid to the employees working on the project which exceeds the amount of contributions collected from the employers who worked on the project which is not covered by the amount of the bond or irrevocable letter of credit.

For the purposes of this section, a project includes all entities that employ or contract for the employment of, or is employing directly or indirectly through agents, independent contractors, or subcontractors, excluding design and engineering firms. Each employing unit, whether contractor, subcontractor, or otherwise, involved in the project is subject to this section, excluding design and engineering firms.

Each employing unit having employees working on a project subject to this section, excluding design and engineering firms, shall maintain separate records for all employment on the project showing each individual’s name, social security number, wages paid, and the dates the wages were paid. The employers shall submit separate reports from other employment subject to the North Dakota unemployment compensation law under a separate reporting account established for the project.

This section applies to projects for which bids are let after August 1, 2001.

The determination of whether a project is subject to this section must be made in the same manner as provided for in section 52-04-17.

This section does not apply to any project in which the state is the owner or contractor.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 596, § 1; 1989, ch. 594, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2001, ch. 455, § 1; 2007, ch. 443, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 443, S.L. 2007
became effective August 1, 2007.

52-04-07.
Benefits paid chargeable to accounts of base-period employers.

Benefits paid to an individual must be charged against the accounts of the individual’s base-period employers. The amount of benefits so chargeable against each base-period employer’s account must bear the same ratio to the benefits paid to an individual as the base-period wages paid to the individual by such employer bear to the total amount of the base-period wages paid to the individual by all of the individual’s base-period employers.

Notwithstanding subsection 1, an employer’s account may not be charged for any of the following:

With benefits paid to an individual for unemployment that is directly caused by a major natural disaster declared by the president pursuant to section 102(2) of the Disaster Relief Act of 1974 [Pub. L. 93-288; 88 Stat. 143; 42 U.S.C. 5122(2)], if the individual would have been eligible for disaster unemployment assistance with respect to that unemployment but for the individual’s receipt of unemployment insurance benefits.

With benefits paid to an individual who:

Left the employment of the base-period employer voluntarily without good cause or with good cause not involving fault on the part of the base-period employer;

Was discharged from employment by the base-period employer for misconduct;

Was separated from employment with the most recent employer for reasons directly attributable to domestic violence, stalking, or sexual assault; or

Is a military spouse who voluntarily left the most recent employment to relocate because of permanent change of station orders of the individual’s military-connected spouse.

As provided under section 52-06-29.

With benefits paid to an individual who is in training with the approval of job service North Dakota.

With benefits paid to an individual who is subsequently determined not entitled to receive the benefits.

With benefits paid to an individual who is currently employed part time with that employer when the hiring agreement between the individual and the employer has not changed since the individual commenced work for that employer. This subdivision does not apply to an employee of a temporary help firm.

Subsection 2 does not apply to benefit payments if:

Benefit payments are financed under a reimbursable method.

An overpayment of unemployment compensation benefits results from:

The employer, or the agent of the employer, failing to respond timely or adequately to the request from the bureau for information relating to a claim for unemployment compensation; and

The employer, or agent of the employer, has established a demonstrated pattern of failing to respond to such requests.

Any nonprofit organization which elects to make payments in lieu of contributions into the unemployment compensation fund as provided in section 52-04-18 is not liable to make such payments with respect to the benefits paid to any individual whose base-period wages include wages for previously uncovered services as defined in subsection 3 of section 52-06-04 to the extent that the unemployment compensation fund is reimbursed for such benefits pursuant to section 121 of Public Law 94-566.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1, an employer’s account may not be charged with benefits paid for previously uncovered services as defined in subsection 3 of section 52-06-04 to the extent that the unemployment compensation fund is reimbursed for such benefits pursuant to section 121 of Public Law 94-566.

This section applies to overpayments established after October 21, 2013.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 4, subs. c, subd. 1; 1941, ch. 261, § 2, subs. c(2); R.C. 1943, § 52-0407; S.L. 1945, ch. 284, § 5; 1953, ch. 297, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 52-0407; S.L. 1963, ch. 335, § 2; 1971, ch. 475, § 15; 1973, ch. 391, § 18; 1977, ch. 459, § 11; 1977, ch. 466, § 1; 1989, ch. 603, § 1; 1993, ch. 494, § 1; 2003, ch. 440, §§ 3, 4; 2005, ch. 458, § 1; 2011, ch. 375, § 2; 2013, ch. 392, § 1; 2015, ch. 355, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 384, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 355, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 392, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 375, S.L. 2011 became effective April 26, 2011, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 4 of chapter 375, S.L. 2011.

52-04-08.
Succession to predecessor’s experience record — Impact of substantial common ownership, management, or control.

An employing unit that in any manner acquires all or part of the organization, business, trade, workforce, or assets of another employer and continues essentially the same business activity of the whole or part transferred, may upon request be transferred in accordance with law and any relevant rules adopted by the agency, the whole or appropriate part of the experience record, reserve balance, and benefit experience of the predecessor employer, unless the agency finds that the employing unit acquired the business solely or primarily for the purpose of obtaining a lower unemployment insurance tax rate. If the predecessor files a written protest against such transfer within fifteen days of being notified of the successor’s application, the transfer will not be made.

When an employing unit in any manner acquires all or part of the organization, business, trade, workforce, or assets of another employer, the agency shall transfer all or the appropriate part of the experience record, reserve balance, whether positive or negative, and benefit experience of such predecessor to the successor if it finds that there was, at the time of acquisition, substantially common ownership, management, or control of the predecessor and the successor.

When a part of an employer’s experience record reserve account and benefit experience is transferred under this section, the portion of the experience record and reserve account transferred must be in the same ratio to the total experience record and reserve account as the average annual payroll of the transferred organization, trade, business, workforce, or assets is to the total average annual payroll of the predecessor.

An employing unit’s experience record may not be transferred in an amount that results in the successor and predecessor portions totaling more than one hundred percent of the predecessor’s history.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 4, subs. c, subd. 2; 1941, ch. 261, § 2, subs. c, subd. 6; R.C. 1943, § 52-0408; S.L. 1945, ch. 284, § 5; 1957 Supp., § 52-0408; S.L. 1971, ch. 476, § 5; 1985, ch. 543, § 4; 1989, ch. 594, § 4; 2001, ch. 453, § 2; 2005, ch. 456, § 4.

52-04-08.1.
Implementation of federal anti-SUTA dumping legislation.

The agency shall implement section 52-04-08.2 to ensure necessary compliance with section 303(k) of the Social Security Act [Pub. L. 108-195; 42 U.S.C. 503]. The agency shall adopt rules and procedures necessary to ensure compliance with that section. The agency may issue necessary subpoenas, in accordance with sections 52-06-23 and 52-06-25, to carry out its responsibilities under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 456, § 5.